Hawaii statutes.
§329-125 Protections afforded to a
qualifying patient or primary caregiver. (a) A qualifying patient or the
primary caregiver may assert the medical use of marijuana authorized under this
part as an affirmative defense to any prosecution involving marijuana under
this part or part IV; or part IV of chapter 712; provided that the qualifying
patient or the primary caregiver strictly complied with the requirements of
this part.

(b) Any qualifying patient or primary
caregiver not complying with the permitted scope of the medical use of
marijuana shall not be afforded the protections against searches and seizures
pertaining to the misapplication of the medical use of marijuana.

(c) No person shall be subject to arrest or
prosecution for simply being in the presence or vicinity of the medical use of
marijuana as permitted under this part. [L 2000, c 228, pt of §2; am L 2016, c
230, §10]

Case Notes

Rule of lenity required the construction, under the specific
facts of the case, of §§329-121 and 329-122 and this section against the
government, as there was an irreconcilable inconsistency between the authorized
transportation of medical marijuana under §329-121, and the prohibition on
transport of medical marijuana through "any ... place open to the public"
under [§329-122(c)(2)(E)]; thus, under §701-115(2)(b), petitioner was entitled
to an acquittal because petitioner's evidence, when considered in light of any
contrary prosecution evidence proved by a preponderance of the evidence the
specified fact or facts with negatived penal liability. 129 H. 397, 301 P.3d
607 (2013).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next